New York, session 2025-2026, A3771.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 169 of the executive law, as added 2 by chapter 263 of the laws of 1987, is amended to read as follows: 3 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other 4 provision of law, the boards of trustees of the state university of New 5 York and the city university of New York shall each establish and imple- 6 ment salary plans for the chancellors, presidents and senior staffs of 7 such state and city universities, respectively. The board of regents 8 shall establish and implement a separate salary plan for the president 9 of the university of the state of New York, setting forth the compen- 10 sation to be received by the president for performing the duties of that 11 office assigned by the rules of the regents or statute, which shall be 12 in addition to the compensation received by such person pursuant to the 13 provisions of subdivisions one and two of this section. Such salary 14 plans shall be developed after consultation with the governor's office 15 of employee relations and the division of the budget. Any increase in 16 compensation for the positions set forth in this subdivision, not other- 17 wise funded from any appropriation, shall be funded from reallocations 18 of funds within the appropriations specifically identified by the afore- 19 mentioned boards. Each board of trustees and the board of regents shall 20 file a proposed salary plan report with the chairs of the senate finance 21 committee and the assembly ways and means committee and the director of 22 the budget at least [sixty] ninety days prior to the proposed effective 23 date of such salary plan. Each salary plan shall not take effect until 24 the salary plan report is approved by the chairs of the senate finance EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07788-01-5 A. 3771 2 1 committee and the assembly ways and means committee and the director of 2 the budget. Each salary plan report shall set forth the salary schedule, 3 the dollar value of additional public compensation and other employment 4 benefits that such positions would receive, the specific sources of 5 funding to be reallocated for salary increases, the amount of increase 6 to be provided to each position, the comparison salary data on which the 7 plan is based, and such other information as the boards of trustees and 8 the board of regents deem appropriate. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 10 have become a law.